Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,296
Attorney General; powers.

To prevent
ongoing and further exploitation of any person who was a participant or portrayed
observer or his or her parent or legal guardian, the Attorney General, upon
request, may pursue cases on behalf of any participant or portrayed observer
or his or her parent or legal guardian who has a bona fide cause of action
under the Exploited Children's Civil Remedy Act. All damages obtained shall
go to the plaintiff or plaintiffs. For his or her role in pursuing a civil
action under the act, the Attorney General may seek all of his or her reasonable
attorney's fees and costs associated with the civil action.

Laws 2010, LB728, § 7.